Florida, session 2026, SB1644.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 109 110 Section 1.âSection 741.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to 111 read: 112 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 113 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 114 injunction; issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction 115 Verification System; enforcement; public records exemption.â 116 (1)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 117 for protection against domestic violence. 118 (a)âAny person described in paragraph (e), who is either 119 the victim of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 or has 120 reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of 121 becoming the victim of any act of domestic violence, has 122 standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition for an 123 injunction for protection against domestic violence. 124 (b)âThis cause of action for an injunction may be sought 125 whether or not any other cause of action is currently pending 126 between the parties. However, the pendency of any such cause of 127 action shall be alleged in the petition. 128 (c)âIn the event a subsequent cause of action is filed 129 under chapter 61, any orders entered therein shall take 130 precedence over any inconsistent provisions of an injunction 131 issued under this section which addresses matters governed by 132 chapter 61. 133 (d)âA personâs right to petition for an injunction shall 134 not be affected by such person having left a residence or 135 household to avoid domestic violence. 136 (e)âThis cause of action for an injunction may be sought by 137 family or household members. No person shall be precluded from 138 seeking injunctive relief pursuant to this chapter solely on the 139 basis that such person is not a spouse. 140 (f)âThis cause of action for an injunction shall not 141 require that either party be represented by an attorney. 142 (g)âAny person, including an officer of the court, who 143 offers evidence or recommendations relating to the cause of 144 action must either present the evidence or recommendations in 145 writing to the court with copies to each party and their 146 attorney, or must present the evidence under oath at a hearing 147 at which all parties are present. 148 (h)âNothing in this section shall affect the title to any 149 real estate. 150 (i)âThe court is prohibited from issuing mutual orders of 151 protection. This does not preclude the court from issuing 152 separate injunctions for protection against domestic violence 153 where each party has complied with the provisions of this 154 section. Compliance with the provisions of this section cannot 155 be waived. 156 (j)âNotwithstanding any provision of chapter 47, a petition 157 for an injunction for protection against domestic violence may 158 be filed in the circuit where the petitioner currently or 159 temporarily resides, where the respondent resides, or where the 160 domestic violence occurred. There is no minimum requirement of 161 residency to petition for an injunction for protection. 162 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the assessment of a 163 filing fee for a petition for protection against domestic 164 violence is prohibited. However, subject to legislative 165 appropriation, the clerk of the circuit court may, on a 166 quarterly basis, submit to the Justice Administrative Commission 167 a certified request for reimbursement for petitions for 168 protection against domestic violence issued by the court, at the 169 rate of $40 per petition. The request for reimbursement must be 170 submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the Justice 171 Administrative Commission. From this reimbursement, the clerk 172 shall pay any law enforcement agency serving the injunction the 173 fee requested by the law enforcement agency; however, this fee 174 may not exceed $20. 175 (b)âNo bond shall be required by the court for the entry of 176 an injunction. 177 (c)1.âThe clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in 178 seeking both injunctions for protection against domestic 179 violence and enforcement for a violation thereof as specified in 180 this section. 181 2.âAll clerksâ offices of the clerk of the court shall 182 provide Supreme Court-approved family law simplified petition 183 forms for the injunction and, any modifications to, and the 184 enforcement thereof, and for a designation of mail and e-mail 185 addresses for service, including instructions for completion. 186 3.âThe clerk of the court shall advise petitioners of the 187 opportunity to apply for a certificate of indigence in lieu of 188 prepayment for the cost of the filing fee, as provided in 189 paragraph (a). 190 4.âThe clerk of the court shall ensure the petitionerâs 191 privacy to the extent practical while completing the forms for 192 injunctions for protection against domestic violence. 193 5.âThe clerk of the court shall provide petitioners with a 194 minimum of two certified copies of the order of the temporary 195 injunction, one of which is serviceable and will inform the 196 petitioner of the process for service and enforcement. 197 6.âClerks of court and appropriate staff in each county 198 shall receive training in the effective assistance of 199 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association 200 of Court Clerks. 201 7.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall make 202 available informational brochures on domestic violence when such 203 brochures are provided by local certified domestic violence 204 centers. 205 8.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall distribute a 206 statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the 207 time of filing for an injunction for protection against domestic 208 or repeat violence when such brochures become available. The 209 brochure must include information about the effect of giving the 210 court false information about domestic violence. 211 (3)(a)âThe verified petition must allege the existence of 212 such domestic violence and must include the specific facts and 213 circumstances upon the basis of which relief is sought. 214 (b)âThe verified petition shall be in substantially the 215 following form: 216 217 PETITION FOR 218 INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 219 AGAINST DOMESTIC VIOLENCE 220 221 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under penalties 222 of perjury that the following statements are true: 223 (a)âPetitioner resides at: ...(address)... 224 (Petitioner may furnish address to the court in a separate 225 confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the petitioner 226 requires the location of the current residence to be 227 confidential.) 228 (b)âRespondent resides at: ...(last known address)... 229 (c)âRespondentâs last known place of employment: ...(name 230 of business and address)... 231 (d)âPhysical description of respondent:.................. 232 Race........ 233 Sex........ 234 Date of birth........ 235 Height........ 236 Weight........ 237 Eye color........ 238 Hair color........ 239 Distinguishing marks or scars........ 240 (e)âAliases of respondent:............................... 241 (f)âRespondent is the spouse or former spouse of the 242 petitioner or is any other person related by blood or marriage 243 to the petitioner or is any other person who is or was residing 244 within a single dwelling unit with the petitioner, as if a 245 family, or is a person with whom the petitioner has a child in 246 common, regardless of whether the petitioner and respondent are 247 or were married or residing together, as if a family. 248 (g)âThe following describes any other cause of action 249 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent:........ 250 ................................................................ 251 The petitioner should also describe any previous or pending 252 attempts by the petitioner to obtain an injunction for 253 protection against domestic violence in this or any other 254 circuit, and the results of that attempt:....................... 255 ................................................................ 256 Case numbers should be included if available. 257 (h)âPetitioner is either a victim of domestic violence or 258 has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger 259 of becoming a victim of domestic violence because respondent 260 has: ...(mark all sections that apply and describe in the spaces 261 below the incidents of violence or threats of violence, 262 specifying when and where they occurred, including, but not 263 limited to, locations such as a home, school, place of 264 employment, or visitation exchange)... 265 ......................................................... 266 ......................................................... 267 ....committed or threatened to commit domestic violence 268 defined in s. 741.28, Florida Statutes, as any assault, 269 aggravated assault, battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, 270 sexual battery, stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, false 271 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 272 injury or death of one family or household member by another. 273 With the exception of persons who are parents of a child in 274 common, the family or household members must be currently 275 residing or have in the past resided together in the same single 276 dwelling unit. 277 ....previously threatened, harassed, stalked, or physically 278 abused the petitioner. 279 ....attempted to harm the petitioner or family members or 280 individuals closely associated with the petitioner. 281 ....threatened to conceal, kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs 282 child or children. 283 ....intentionally injured or killed a family pet. 284 ....used, or has threatened to use, against the petitioner 285 any weapons such as guns or knives. 286 ....physically restrained the petitioner from leaving the 287 home or calling law enforcement. 288 ....a criminal history involving violence or the threat of 289 violence (if known). 290 ....another order of protection issued against him or her 291 previously or from another jurisdiction (if known). 292 ....destroyed personal property, including, but not limited 293 to, telephones or other communication equipment, clothing, or 294 other items belonging to the petitioner. 295 ....engaged in a pattern of abusive, threatening, 296 intimidating, or controlling behavior composed of a series of 297 acts over a period of time, however short. 298 ....engaged in any other behavior or conduct that leads the 299 petitioner to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in 300 imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. 301 (i)âPetitioner alleges the following additional specific 302 facts: ...(mark appropriate sections)... 303 ....A minor child or minor children reside with the 304 petitioner whose names and ages are as follows: 305 306 ....Petitioner needs the exclusive use and possession of 307 the dwelling that the parties share. 308 ....Petitioner is unable to obtain safe alternative housing 309 because: 310 311 ....Petitioner genuinely fears that respondent imminently 312 will abuse, remove, or hide the minor child or children from 313 petitioner because: 314 315 (j)âPetitioner genuinely fears imminent domestic violence 316 by respondent. 317 (k)âPetitioner seeks an injunction: ...(mark appropriate 318 section or sections)... 319 ....Immediately restraining the respondent from committing 320 any acts of domestic violence. 321 ....Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of 322 domestic violence. 323 ....Awarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use 324 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or 325 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 326 ....Providing a temporary parenting plan, including a 327 temporary time-sharing schedule, with regard to the minor child 328 or children of the parties which might involve prohibiting or 329 limiting time-sharing or requiring that it be supervised by a 330 third party. 331 ....Designating that the exchange of the minor child or 332 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 333 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 334 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if 335 temporary time-sharing of the child is awarded to the 336 respondent. 337 ....Establishing temporary support for the minor child or 338 children or the petitioner. 339 ....Directing the respondent to participate in a batterersâ 340 intervention program. 341 ....Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the 342 protection of a victim of domestic violence, or any minor 343 children of the victim, including any injunctions or directives 344 to law enforcement agencies. 345 346 (c)âEvery petition for an injunction against domestic 347 violence must contain, directly above the signature line, a 348 statement in all capital letters and bold type not smaller than 349 the surrounding text, as follows: 350 351 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ 352 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT 353 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN 354 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF 355 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, 356 FLORIDA STATUTES. 357 358 ...(initials)... 359 360 (d)âIf the verified petition seeks to determine a parenting 361 plan and time-sharing schedule with regard to the minor child or 362 children of the parties, the verified petition must be 363 accompanied by or must incorporate the allegations required by 364 s. 61.522 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 365 Enforcement Act. 366 (4)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 367 the petition ex parte and must set a final hearing to be held at 368 the earliest possible time if it appears the petitioner is a 369 victim of domestic violence or has reasonable cause to believe 370 he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic 371 violence. If a final hearing is set, the respondent must shall 372 be personally served by a law enforcement officer with a copy of 373 the petition, financial affidavit, Uniform Child Custody 374 Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act affidavit, if any, notice of 375 final hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, before prior to 376 the final hearing. 377 (5)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if it appears to the 378 court that an immediate and present danger of domestic violence 379 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte, 380 pending a final full hearing, and may grant such relief as the 381 court deems proper, including an injunction: 382 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any acts of 383 domestic violence. 384 2.âAwarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive use 385 and possession of the dwelling that the parties share or 386 excluding the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 387 3.âOn the same basis as provided in s. 61.13, providing the 388 petitioner a temporary parenting plan, including a time-sharing 389 schedule, which may award the petitioner up to 100 percent of 390 the time-sharing. If temporary time-sharing is awarded to the 391 respondent, the exchange of the child must occur at a neutral 392 safe exchange location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location 393 authorized by a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 394 753.01 if the court determines it is in the best interests of 395 the child after consideration of all of the factors specified in 396 s. 61.13(3). The temporary parenting plan remains in effect 397 until the order expires or an order is entered by a court of 398 competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action 399 or proceeding affecting the placement of, access to, parental 400 time with, adoption of, or parental rights and responsibilities 401 for the minor child. 402 4.âIf the petitioner and respondent have an existing 403 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court 404 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or 405 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 406 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 407 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the 408 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after 409 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3). 410 5.âAwarding to the petitioner the temporary exclusive care, 411 possession, or control of an animal that is owned, possessed, 412 harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the respondent, or a 413 minor child residing in the residence or household of the 414 petitioner or respondent. The court may order the respondent to 415 temporarily have no contact with the animal and prohibit the 416 respondent from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, 417 harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal. This subparagraph 418 does not apply to an animal owned primarily for a bona fide 419 agricultural purpose, as defined under s. 193.461, or to a 420 service animal, as defined under s. 413.08, if the respondent is 421 the service animalâs handler. 422 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review 423 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining 424 such ex parte temporary injunction, no evidence other than 425 verified pleadings or affidavits shall be used as evidence, 426 unless the respondent appears at the hearing or has received 427 reasonable notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an 428 ex parte temporary injunction shall be by written order noting 429 the legal grounds for denial. When the only ground for denial is 430 no appearance of an immediate and present danger of domestic 431 violence, the court shall set a final full hearing on the 432 petition for injunction with notice at the earliest possible 433 time. Nothing herein affects a petitionerâs right to promptly 434 amend any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any 435 petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. 436 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction shall be 437 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. A final full 438 hearing, as provided by this section, shall be set for a date no 439 later than the date when the temporary injunction ceases to be 440 effective. The court may grant a continuance of the hearing 441 before or during a hearing for good cause shown by any party, 442 which shall include a continuance to obtain service of process. 443 Any injunction shall be extended if necessary to remain in full 444 force and effect during any period of continuance. 445 (6)(a)âUpon notice and final hearing, when it appears to 446 the court that the petitioner is either the victim of domestic 447 violence as defined by s. 741.28 or has reasonable cause to 448 believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of 449 domestic violence, the court may grant such relief as the court 450 deems proper, including an injunction: 451 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any acts of 452 domestic violence. 453 2.âAwarding to the petitioner the exclusive use and 454 possession of the dwelling that the parties share or excluding 455 the respondent from the residence of the petitioner. 456 3.âOn the same basis as provided in chapter 61, providing 457 the petitioner with 100 percent of the time-sharing in a 458 temporary parenting plan that remains in effect until the order 459 expires or an order is entered by a court of competent 460 jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action or 461 proceeding affecting the placement of, access to, parental time 462 with, adoption of, or parental rights and responsibilities for 463 the minor child. 464 4.âIf the petitioner and respondent have an existing 465 parenting plan or time-sharing schedule under another court 466 order, designating that the exchange of the minor child or 467 children of the parties must occur at a neutral safe exchange 468 location as provided in s. 125.01(8) or a location authorized by 469 a supervised visitation program as defined in s. 753.01 if the 470 court determines it is in the best interests of the child after 471 consideration of all of the factors specified in s. 61.13(3). 472 5.âOn the same basis as provided in chapter 61, 473 establishing temporary support for a minor child or children or 474 the petitioner. An order of temporary support remains in effect 475 until the order expires or an order is entered by a court of 476 competent jurisdiction in a pending or subsequent civil action 477 or proceeding affecting child support. 478 6.âOrdering the respondent to participate in treatment, 479 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the 480 respondent. When the court orders the respondent to participate 481 in a batterersâ intervention program, the court, or any entity 482 designated by the court, must provide the respondent with a list 483 of batterersâ intervention programs from which the respondent 484 must choose a program in which to participate. 485 7.âReferring a petitioner to a certified domestic violence 486 center. The court must provide the petitioner with a list of 487 certified domestic violence centers in the circuit which the 488 petitioner may contact. 489 8.âAwarding to the petitioner the exclusive care, 490 possession, or control of an animal that is owned, possessed, 491 harbored, kept, or held by the petitioner, the respondent, or a 492 minor child residing in the residence or household of the 493 petitioner or respondent. The court may order the respondent to 494 have no contact with the animal and prohibit the respondent from 495 taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, harming, or 496 otherwise disposing of the animal. This subparagraph does not 497 apply to an animal owned primarily for a bona fide agricultural 498 purpose, as defined under s. 193.461, or to a service animal, as 499 defined under s. 413.08, if the respondent is the service 500 animalâs handler. 501 9.âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 502 for the protection of a victim of domestic violence, including 503 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as 504 provided in this section. 505 (b)âIn determining whether a petitioner has reasonable 506 cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 507 victim of domestic violence, the court shall consider and 508 evaluate all relevant factors alleged in the petition, 509 including, but not limited to: 510 1.âThe history between the petitioner and the respondent, 511 including threats, harassment, stalking, strangulation, or other 512 and physical abuse. 513 2.âWhether the respondent has attempted to harm the 514 petitioner or family members or individuals closely associated 515 with the petitioner. 516 3.âWhether the respondent has threatened to conceal, 517 kidnap, or harm the petitionerâs child or children. 518 4.âWhether the respondent has intentionally injured or 519 killed a family pet. 520 5.âWhether the respondent has used, or has threatened to 521 use, against the petitioner any weapons such as guns or knives. 522 6.âWhether the respondent has physically restrained the 523 petitioner from leaving the home or calling law enforcement. 524 7.âWhether the respondent has a criminal history involving 525 violence or the threat of violence. 526 8.âThe existence of a verifiable order of protection issued 527 previously or from another jurisdiction. 528 9.âWhether the respondent has destroyed personal property, 529 including, but not limited to, telephones or other 530 communications equipment, clothing, or other items belonging to 531 the petitioner. 532 10.âWhether the respondent has or had engaged in a pattern 533 of abusive, threatening, intimidating, or controlling behavior 534 composed of a series of acts over a period of time, however 535 short, which evidences a continuity of purpose and which 536 reasonably causes the petitioner to believe that the petitioner 537 or his or her minor child or children are in imminent danger of 538 becoming victims of any act of domestic violence. 539 11.âWhether the respondent engaged in any other behavior or 540 conduct that leads the petitioner to have reasonable cause to 541 believe that he or she is in imminent danger of becoming a 542 victim of domestic violence. 543 544 In making its determination under this paragraph, the court is 545 not limited to those factors enumerated in subparagraphs 1.-11. 546 (c)âThe terms of an injunction restraining the respondent 547 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the 548 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)9. shall remain 549 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 550 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. No specific 551 allegations are required. Such relief may be granted in addition 552 to other civil or criminal remedies. 553 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 554 protection against domestic violence entered under this section 555 shall, on its face, indicate that: 556 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 557 of the State of Florida. 558 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 559 under s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 560 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 561 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 562 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 563 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 564 process. 565 4.âThe date the respondent was served with the temporary or 566 final order, if obtainable. 567 (e)âAn injunction for protection against domestic violence 568 entered under this section, on its face, may order that the 569 respondent attend a batterersâ intervention program as a 570 condition of the injunction. Unless the court makes written 571 factual findings in its judgment or order which are based on 572 substantial evidence, stating why batterersâ intervention 573 programs would be inappropriate, the court shall order the 574 respondent to attend a batterersâ intervention program if: 575 1.âIt finds that the respondent willfully violated the 576 temporary ex parte injunction; 577 2.âThe respondent, in this state or any other state, has 578 been convicted of, had adjudication withheld on, or pled nolo 579 contendere to a crime involving violence or a threat of 580 violence; or 581 3.âThe respondent, in this state or any other state, has 582 had at any time a prior injunction for protection entered 583 against the respondent after a hearing with notice. 584 (f)âThe fact that a separate order of protection is granted 585 to each opposing party is not legally sufficient to deny any 586 remedy to either party or to prove that the parties are equally 587 at fault or equally endangered. 588 (g)âA final judgment on injunction for protection against 589 domestic violence entered under this section must, on its face, 590 indicate that it is a violation of s. 790.233, and a first 591 degree misdemeanor, for the respondent to have in his or her 592 care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or ammunition. 593 (h)âAll proceedings under this subsection shall be 594 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by 595 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration. 596 (7)âThe court shall allow an advocate from a state 597 attorneyâs office, an advocate from a law enforcement agency, or 598 an advocate from a certified domestic violence center who is 599 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or 600 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to 601 the injunction for protection, provided the petitioner or 602 respondent has made such a request and the advocate is able to 603 be present. 604 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 605 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 606 domestic violence, the clerk of the court shall electronically 607 transmit a copy of the petition, a form for the designation of 608 mail and e-mail address for service, financial affidavit, 609 Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act 610 affidavit, if any, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, 611 if any, to the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county 612 where the respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it 613 upon the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of 614 the week and at any time of the day or night. The respondent 615 shall inform the clerk of the court of the respondentâs 616 designated mail or e-mail address for subsequent service within 617 1 business day after the respondent has been personally served. 618 An electronic copy of the temporary an injunction must be 619 certified by the clerk of the court, and the electronic copy 620 must be served in the same manner as a certified copy. Upon 621 receiving an electronic copy of the temporary injunction, the 622 sheriff must verify receipt with the sender before attempting to 623 serve it upon the respondent. In addition, if the sheriff is in 624 possession of a temporary an injunction for protection that has 625 been certified by the clerk of the court, the sheriff may 626 electronically transmit a copy of that temporary injunction to a 627 law enforcement officer who shall serve it in the same manner as 628 a certified copy. The clerk of the court is responsible for 629 furnishing to the sheriff such information on the respondentâs 630 physical description and location as is required by the 631 department to comply with the verification procedures set forth 632 in this section. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 633 the chief judge of each circuit, in consultation with the 634 appropriate sheriff, may authorize a law enforcement agency 635 within the jurisdiction to effect service. A law enforcement 636 agency serving injunctions pursuant to this section must use 637 service and verification procedures consistent with those of the 638 sheriff. 639 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 640 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 641 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 642 accompany the petitioner and assist in placing the petitioner in 643 possession of the dwelling or residence, or otherwise assist in 644 the execution or service of the temporary or final injunction. A 645 law enforcement officer must accept a copy of the temporary or 646 final an injunction for protection against domestic violence, 647 certified by the clerk of the court, from the petitioner and 648 immediately serve it upon a respondent who has been located but 649 not yet served. 650 3.âAll orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or 651 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 652 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 653 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 654 entry of the subsequent order, if a party is physically present 655 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 656 order in writing on the face of the original order. If In the 657 event a party fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a 658 certified copy of an order, the clerk shall note on the original 659 order that service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is 660 not possible or the parties have appeared through audio-video 661 communication technology, the clerk must shall mail or e-mail 662 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known 663 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 664 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 665 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection, 666 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in 667 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service 668 and shall notify the sheriff. 669 670 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer 671 previously with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing 672 on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing on the 673 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction 674 seeking an extension of time, any subsequent temporary or final 675 injunction, or any subsequent order may be served on the 676 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e-mail 677 in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer. 678 (b)âA Domestic and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide 679 Injunction Verification System is created within the Department 680 of Law Enforcement. The department shall establish, implement, 681 and maintain a statewide communication system capable of 682 electronically transmitting information to and between criminal 683 justice agencies relating to domestic violence injunctions, 684 dating violence injunctions, sexual violence injunctions, and 685 repeat violence injunctions, and stalking injunctions issued by 686 the courts throughout the state. Such information must include, 687 but is not limited to, information as to the existence and 688 status of any injunction for verification purposes. 689 (c)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a temporary an 690 injunction for protection against domestic violence or changes, 691 continues, extends, or vacates an injunction for protection 692 against domestic violence, the clerk of the court must 693 electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction for 694 service to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence of 695 the petitioner. The injunction must be served in accordance with 696 this subsection. 697 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 698 injunction for protection against domestic violence upon a 699 respondent, the law enforcement officer must electronically 700 transmit the written proof of service of process to the sheriff 701 with jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 702 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 703 copy of the injunction for protection against domestic violence, 704 the sheriff must make information relating to the injunction 705 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically 706 transmitting such information to the department. 707 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 708 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 709 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 710 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 711 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 712 department. 713 5.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a final 714 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 715 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against 716 domestic violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail certified 717 copies of the injunction order to the last known physical or e 718 mail address of each party. Service by mail or e-mail is 719 complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is served 720 pursuant to this subsection by the clerk of the court, the clerk 721 shall prepare a written certification to be placed in the court 722 file specifying the time, date, and method of service. The clerk 723 of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of 724 the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the 725 residence of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff 726 receives a certified copy of the injunction for protection 727 against domestic violence under this subsection, the sheriff 728 must make information relating to the injunction available to 729 other law enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting 730 such information to the department. 731 6.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 732 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 733 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 734 injunction for protection against domestic violence and other 735 court actions related to the injunction for protection. The 736 automated notice must be made within 12 hours after the sheriff 737 or other law enforcement officer serves the injunction upon the 738 respondent. The notification must include, at a minimum, the 739 date, time, and location where the injunction for protection 740 against domestic violence was served. The Florida Association of 741 Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply for any available grants 742 to fund the development of the automated process. 743 7.6.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 744 against domestic violence is vacated, terminated, or otherwise 745 rendered no longer effective by ruling of the court, the clerk 746 of the court must notify the sheriff receiving original 747 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. 748 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such 749 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department 750 of such action of the court. 751 (d)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 752 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 753 protection. 754 (9)(a)âThe court may enforce a violation of an injunction 755 for protection against domestic violence through a civil or 756 criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may 757 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 741.31. The court 758 may enforce the respondentâs compliance with the injunction 759 through any appropriate civil and criminal remedies, including, 760 but not limited to, a monetary assessment or a fine. The clerk 761 of the court shall collect and receive such assessments or 762 fines. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall transfer the moneys 763 collected pursuant to this paragraph to the State Treasury for 764 deposit in the Domestic Violence Trust Fund established in s. 765 741.01. 766 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 767 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 741.31, the 768 respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the 769 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing 770 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with 771 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, 772 pending a hearing. 773 (10)âThe petitioner or the respondent may move the court to 774 modify or dissolve an injunction at any time. 775 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3), paragraph (b) 776 of subsection (4), and subsections (5) through (9) of section 777 784.046, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph (f) is 778 added to subsection (2) of that section, to read: 779 784.046âAction by victim of repeat violence, sexual 780 violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; dating 781 violence investigations, notice to victims, and reporting; 782 pretrial release violations; public records exemption.â 783 (2)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 784 for protection in cases of repeat violence, there is created a 785 separate cause of action for an injunction for protection in 786 cases of dating violence, and there is created a separate cause 787 of action for an injunction for protection in cases of sexual 788 violence. 789 (f)âA court may not issue mutual orders of protection; 790 however, the court is not precluded from issuing separate 791 injunctions for protection against repeat violence, sexual 792 violence, or dating violence if each party has complied with 793 this section. Compliance with this section may not be waived. 794 (3)(a)âThe clerk of the court shall provide a copy of this 795 section, Supreme Court-approved family law forms for the 796 injunction and any modifications to and the enforcement thereof, 797 and for a designation of mail and e-mail address for service 798 simplified forms, and clerical assistance for the preparation 799 and filing of such a petition by any person who is not 800 represented by counsel. 801 (4) 802 (b)âThe verified petition must be in substantially the 803 following form: 804 805 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 806 AGAINST REPEAT VIOLENCE, SEXUAL 807 VIOLENCE, OR DATING VIOLENCE 808 809 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 810 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true: 811 812 1.âPetitioner resides at ...(address)... (A petitioner for 813 an injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 814 violence, or dating violence may furnish an address to the court 815 in a separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons, the 816 petitioner requires the location of his or her current residence 817 to be confidential pursuant to s. 119.071(2)(j), Florida 818 Statutes.) 819 2.âRespondent resides at ...(address).... 820 3.a.âPetitioner has suffered repeat violence as 821 demonstrated by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate 822 incidents of violence)... 823 824 825 826 827 828 b.âPetitioner has suffered sexual violence as demonstrated 829 by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate incident of 830 violence and include incident report number from law enforcement 831 agency or attach notice of inmate release)... 832 833 834 835 836 837 c.âPetitioner is a victim of dating violence and has 838 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 839 of becoming the victim of another act of dating violence or has 840 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 841 of becoming a victim of dating violence, as demonstrated by the 842 fact that the respondent has: ...(list the specific incident or 843 incidents of violence and describe the length of time of the 844 relationship, whether it has been in existence during the last 6 845 months, the nature of the relationship of a romantic or intimate 846 nature, the frequency and type of interaction, and any other 847 facts that characterize the relationship)... 848 849 850 851 852 853 4.âPetitioner genuinely fears repeat violence by the 854 respondent. 855 5.âPetitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the 856 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further 857 acts of violence; an injunction enjoining the respondent from 858 committing any further acts of violence; and an injunction 859 providing any terms the court deems necessary for the protection 860 of the petitioner and the petitionerâs immediate family, 861 including any injunctions or directives to law enforcement 862 agencies. 863 864 (5)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 865 the petition ex parte and must set a final hearing to be held at 866 the earliest possible time if it appears that the petitioner 867 meets the criteria of paragraph (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or 868 paragraph (2)(c). If a final hearing is set, the respondent must 869 shall be personally served by a law enforcement officer with a 870 copy of the petition, a form for the designation of mail and e 871 mail addresses, notice of final hearing, and temporary 872 injunction, if any, before prior to the final hearing. 873 (6)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if When it appears to 874 the court that an immediate and present danger of violence 875 exists, the court may grant a temporary injunction ex parte 876 which may be granted in an ex parte hearing, pending a final 877 full hearing, and may grant such relief as the court deems 878 proper, including an injunction enjoining the respondent from 879 committing any acts of violence. 880 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an a hearing ex 881 parte review or hearing for the purpose of obtaining such 882 temporary injunction, no evidence other than the verified 883 pleadings or affidavits may not pleading or affidavit shall be 884 used as evidence, unless the respondent appears at the hearing 885 or has received reasonable notice of the hearing. A courtâs 886 denial of a petition for an ex parte temporary injunction must 887 be by written order noting the legal grounds for the denial. 888 When the only grounds for denial is no appearance of an 889 immediate and present danger of violence, the court may set a 890 final hearing on the petition without issuing a temporary 891 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This 892 paragraph does not affect a petitionerâs right to promptly 893 dismiss a petition, amend a petition, or otherwise be heard in 894 person on a petition consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil 895 Procedure. 896 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction shall be 897 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. However, an 898 ex parte temporary injunction granted under subparagraph 899 (2)(c)2. is effective for 15 days following the date the 900 respondent is released from incarceration. If a final A full 901 hearing is set, it must as provided by this section, shall be 902 set for a date no later than the date when the temporary 903 injunction ceases to be effective. The court may grant a 904 continuance of the temporary ex parte injunction before or 905 during the final and the full hearing before or during a 906 hearing, for good cause shown by any party, which includes a 907 continuance to obtain service of process. Any injunction must be 908 extended if necessary to remain in full force and effect during 909 any period of continuance. 910 (7)âUpon notice and final hearing, the court may grant such 911 relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction: 912 (a)âEnjoining the respondent from committing any acts of 913 violence. 914 (b)âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 915 for the protection of the petitioner, including injunctions or 916 directives to law enforcement agencies, as provided in this 917 section. 918 (c)âThe terms of the injunction shall remain in full force 919 and effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 920 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Such relief may 921 be granted in addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 922 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 923 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 924 violence entered pursuant to this section shall, on its face, 925 indicate that: 926 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 927 of the State of Florida. 928 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 929 pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 930 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 931 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 932 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 933 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 934 process. 935 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 936 temporary or final order, if obtainable. 937 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 938 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 939 repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, the clerk 940 of the court shall electronically transmit a copy of the 941 petition, notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, 942 to the sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where 943 the respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon 944 the respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the 945 week and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall 946 inform the clerk of the court of the respondentâs designated 947 mail or e-mail address for subsequent service within 1 business 948 day after the respondent has been personally served. An 949 electronic copy of the temporary an injunction must be certified 950 by the clerk of the court, and the electronic copy must be 951 served in the same manner as a certified copy. Upon receiving an 952 electronic copy of the temporary injunction, the sheriff must 953 verify receipt with the sender before attempting to serve it 954 upon the respondent. In addition, if the sheriff is in 955 possession of the temporary an injunction for protection that 956 has been certified by the clerk of the court, the sheriff may 957 electronically transmit a copy of that temporary injunction to a 958 law enforcement officer who shall serve it in the same manner as 959 a certified copy. The clerk of the court is responsible for 960 furnishing to the sheriff such information on the respondentâs 961 physical description and location as is required by the 962 department to comply with the verification procedures set forth 963 in this section. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 964 the chief judge of each circuit, in consultation with the 965 appropriate sheriff, may authorize a law enforcement agency 966 within the chief judgeâs jurisdiction to effect this type of 967 service and to receive a portion of the service fee. A person 968 may not serve or execute a temporary an injunction issued under 969 this section unless the person is a law enforcement officer as 970 defined in chapter 943. 971 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 972 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 973 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 974 accompany the petitioner and assist in the execution or service 975 of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement officer 976 must accept a copy of the temporary or final an injunction for 977 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 978 violence, certified by the clerk of the court, from the 979 petitioner and immediately serve it upon a respondent who has 980 been located but not yet served. 981 3.âAll orders issued, changed, continued, extended, or 982 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 983 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 984 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 985 entry of the subsequent order if a party is physically present 986 before the court. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 987 order in writing on the face of the original order. If a party 988 fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a certified copy 989 of an order, the clerk must note on the original order that 990 service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is not 991 possible, or the parties have appeared through audio-video 992 communication technology, the clerk must mail or e-mail 993 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known 994 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 995 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 996 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection, 997 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in 998 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service 999 and shall notify the sheriff. 1000 1001 If the respondent has been served by a law enforcement officer 1002 with the temporary injunction or a notice of hearing on a 1003 temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for injunction 1004 seeking an extension of time, or any subsequent temporary 1005 injunction, final injunction, or order, may be served on the 1006 respondent by the clerk of the court by certified mail or e 1007 mail, in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement officer. 1008 4.âAll proceedings under this paragraph must be recorded. 1009 Recording may be by electronic means as provided by the Rules of 1010 General Practice and Judicial Administration. 1011 (b)âA Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat Violence 1012 Injunction Statewide Injunction Verification System is created 1013 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall 1014 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication 1015 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1016 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1017 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 1018 injunctions, and repeat violence injunctions, and stalking 1019 injunctions issued by the courts throughout the state. Such 1020 information must include, but is not limited to, information as 1021 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification 1022 purposes. 1023 (c)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an injunction 1024 for protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or 1025 dating violence or changes or vacates an injunction for 1026 protection against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating 1027 violence, the clerk of the court must electronically transmit a 1028 copy of the injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the 1029 residence of the petitioner. 1030 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 1031 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 1032 violence, or dating violence upon a respondent, the law 1033 enforcement officer must electronically transmit the written 1034 proof of service of process to the sheriff with jurisdiction 1035 over the residence of the petitioner. 1036 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 1037 copy of the injunction for protection against repeat violence, 1038 sexual violence, or dating violence, the sheriff must make 1039 information relating to the injunction available to other law 1040 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 1041 information to the department. 1042 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 1043 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 1044 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 1045 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 1046 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 1047 department. 1048 5.â Within 24 hours after the court issues a final 1049 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 1050 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against repeat, 1051 sexual, or dating violence, the clerk must mail or e-mail 1052 certified copies of the injunction order to the last known 1053 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 1054 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 1055 served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a 1056 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying 1057 the time, date, and method of service. The clerk of the court 1058 shall electronically transmit a certified copy of the injunction 1059 to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence of the 1060 petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a 1061 certified copy of the injunction for protection against domestic 1062 violence under this subsection, the sheriff must make 1063 information relating to the injunction available to other law 1064 enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 1065 information to the department. 1066 6.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 1067 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 1068 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 1069 injunction for protection against repeat violence, sexual 1070 violence, or dating violence and other court actions related to 1071 the injunction for protection. The automated notice must be made 1072 within 12 hours after the sheriff or other law enforcement 1073 officer serves the injunction upon the respondent. The 1074 notification must include, at a minimum, the date, time, and 1075 location where the injunction for protection against repeat 1076 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence was served. The 1077 Florida Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers may apply 1078 for any available grants to fund the development of the 1079 automated process. 1080 7.6.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 1081 against repeat violence, sexual violence, or dating violence is 1082 lifted, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer effective by 1083 ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must notify the 1084 sheriff or local law enforcement agency receiving original 1085 notification of the injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. 1086 That agency shall, within 24 hours after receiving such 1087 notification from the clerk of the court, notify the department 1088 of such action of the court. 1089 (d)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 1090 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 1091 protection. 1092 (9)(a)âThe court shall enforce, through a civil or criminal 1093 contempt proceeding, a violation of the temporary or final an 1094 injunction for protection. The court may enforce the 1095 respondentâs compliance with the injunction by imposing a 1096 monetary assessment. The clerk of the court shall collect and 1097 receive such assessments. On a monthly basis, the clerk shall 1098 transfer the moneys collected pursuant to this paragraph to the 1099 State Treasury for deposit in the Crimes Compensation Trust Fund 1100 established in s. 960.21. 1101 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 1102 officer under s. 901.15(6) for committing an act of repeat 1103 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence in violation of a 1104 temporary or final an injunction for protection, the respondent 1105 shall be held in custody until brought before the court as 1106 expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing the 1107 injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with chapter 1108 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, pending a 1109 hearing. 1110 Section 3.âSection 784.0485, Florida Statutes, is amended 1111 to read: 1112 784.0485âStalking; injunction; powers and duties of court 1113 and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary injunction; 1114 issuance of injunction; Statewide Injunction Verification 1115 System; enforcement.â 1116 (1)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 1117 for protection against stalking. For the purposes of injunctions 1118 for protection against stalking under this section, the offense 1119 of stalking shall include the offense of cyberstalking. 1120 (a)âA person who is the victim of stalking or the parent or 1121 legal guardian of a minor child who is living at home who seeks 1122 an injunction for protection against stalking on behalf of the 1123 minor child has standing in the circuit court to file a verified 1124 petition for an injunction for protection against stalking. 1125 (b)âThe cause of action for an injunction for protection 1126 may be sought regardless of whether any other cause of action is 1127 currently pending between the parties. However, the pendency of 1128 any such cause of action shall be alleged in the petition. 1129 (c)âThe cause of action for an injunction may be sought by 1130 any affected person. 1131 (d)âThe cause of action for an injunction does not require 1132 either party to be represented by an attorney. 1133 (e)âThe court may not issue mutual orders of protection; 1134 however, the court is not precluded from issuing separate 1135 injunctions for protection against stalking if each party has 1136 complied with this section. Compliance with this section may not 1137 be waived. 1138 (f)âNotwithstanding chapter 47, a petition for an 1139 injunction for protection against stalking may be filed in the 1140 circuit where the petitioner currently or temporarily resides, 1141 where the respondent resides, or where the stalking occurred. 1142 There is no minimum requirement of residency to petition for an 1143 injunction for protection. 1144 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of court 1145 may not assess a filing fee to file a petition for protection 1146 against stalking. However, subject to legislative appropriation, 1147 the clerk of the circuit court may, on a quarterly basis, submit 1148 to the Justice Administrative Commission a certified request for 1149 reimbursement for petitions for protection against stalking 1150 issued by the court, at the rate of $40 per petition. The 1151 request for reimbursement must be submitted in the form and 1152 manner prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From 1153 this reimbursement, the clerk shall pay any law enforcement 1154 agency serving the injunction the fee requested by the law 1155 enforcement agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20. 1156 (b)âA bond is not required by the court for the entry of an 1157 injunction. 1158 (c)1.âThe clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in 1159 seeking both injunctions for protection against stalking and 1160 enforcement of a violation thereof as specified in this section. 1161 2.âAll offices of the clerk of the court shall provide 1162 Supreme Court-approved family law simplified petition forms for 1163 the injunction and any modifications to and the enforcement 1164 thereof, and for a designation of mail and e-mail addresses for 1165 service, including instructions for completion. 1166 3.âThe clerk of the court shall ensure the petitionerâs 1167 privacy to the extent practicable while completing the forms for 1168 an injunction for protection against stalking. 1169 4.âThe clerk of the court shall provide a petitioner with a 1170 minimum of two certified copies of the order of injunction, one 1171 of which is serviceable and will inform the petitioner of the 1172 process for service and enforcement. 1173 5.âThe clerk of the court and appropriate staff in each 1174 county shall receive training in the effective assistance of 1175 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association 1176 of Court Clerks and Comptrollers. 1177 6.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall make 1178 available informational brochures on stalking when such a 1179 brochure is provided by the local certified domestic violence 1180 center or certified rape crisis center. 1181 7.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall distribute a 1182 statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the 1183 time of filing for an injunction for protection against stalking 1184 when such brochures become available. The brochure must include 1185 information about the effect of giving the court false 1186 information. 1187 (3)(a)âThe verified petition shall allege the existence of 1188 such stalking and shall include the specific facts and 1189 circumstances for which relief is sought. 1190 (b)âThe verified petition shall be in substantially the 1191 following form: 1192 1193 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION 1194 FOR PROTECTION AGAINST STALKING 1195 1196 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 1197 penalties of perjury that the following statements are 1198 true: 1199 1200 1.âPetitioner resides at: ...(address)... 1201 (Petitioner may furnish the address to the court in a 1202 separate confidential filing if, for safety reasons, 1203 the petitioner requires the location of the current 1204 residence to be confidential.) 1205 2.âRespondent resides at: ...(last known address)... 1206 3.âRespondentâs last known place of employment: 1207 ...(name of business and address)... 1208 4.âPhysical description of respondent: .... 1209 5.âRace: .... 1210 6.âSex: .... 1211 7.âDate of birth: .... 1212 8.âHeight: .... 1213 9.âWeight: .... 1214 10.âEye color: .... 1215 11.âHair color: .... 1216 12.âDistinguishing marks or scars: .... 1217 13.âAliases of respondent: .... 1218 1219 (c)âThe petitioner shall describe any other cause of action 1220 currently pending between the petitioner and respondent. The 1221 petitioner shall also describe any previous attempt by the 1222 petitioner to obtain an injunction for protection against 1223 stalking in this or any other circuit, and the result of that 1224 attempt. (Case numbers should be included, if available.) 1225 (d)âThe petition must provide space for the petitioner to 1226 specifically allege that he or she is a victim of stalking 1227 because respondent has: 1228 1229 (Mark all sections that apply and describe in the 1230 spaces below the incidents of stalking specifying when 1231 and where they occurred, including, but not limited 1232 to, locations such as a home, school, or place of 1233 employment.) 1234 1235 .... Committed stalking. 1236 .... Previously threatened, harassed, stalked, 1237 cyberstalked, or physically abused the petitioner. 1238 .... Threatened to harm the petitioner or family members or 1239 individuals closely associated with the petitioner. 1240 .... Intentionally injured or killed a family pet. 1241 .... Used, or threatened to use, against the petitioner any 1242 weapons such as guns or knives. 1243 .... A criminal history involving violence or the threat of 1244 violence, if known. 1245 .... Another order of protection issued against him or her 1246 previously or from another jurisdiction, if known. 1247 .... Destroyed personal property, including, but not 1248 limited to, telephones or other communication equipment, 1249 clothing, or other items belonging to the petitioner. 1250 1251 (e)âThe petitioner seeks an injunction: 1252 1253 (Mark appropriate section or sections.) 1254 1255 .... Immediately restraining the respondent from committing 1256 any acts of stalking. 1257 .... Restraining the respondent from committing any acts of 1258 stalking. 1259 .... Providing any terms the court deems necessary for the 1260 protection of a victim of stalking, including any injunctions or 1261 directives to law enforcement agencies. 1262 1263 (f)âEvery petition for an injunction against stalking must 1264 contain, directly above the signature line, a statement in all 1265 capital letters and bold type not smaller than the surrounding 1266 text, as follows: 1267 1268 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ 1269 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT 1270 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN 1271 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF 1272 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, 1273 FLORIDA STATUTES. 1274 1275 ...(initials)... 1276 1277 (4)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall review 1278 the petition ex parte and must set a final hearing to be held at 1279 the earliest possible time if it appears that the petitioner is 1280 a victim of stalking. If a final hearing is set, the respondent 1281 must shall be personally served by a law enforcement officer 1282 with a copy of the petition, notice of hearing, and temporary 1283 injunction, if any, before the final hearing. 1284 (5)(a)âUpon review of the petition, if it appears to the 1285 court that stalking exists, the court may grant a temporary 1286 injunction ex parte, pending a final full hearing, and may grant 1287 such relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction 1288 restraining the respondent from committing any act of stalking. 1289 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in an ex parte review 1290 or an a hearing ex parte hearing for the purpose of obtaining 1291 such ex parte temporary injunction, evidence other than verified 1292 pleadings or affidavits may not be used as evidence, unless the 1293 respondent appears at the hearing or has received reasonable 1294 notice of the hearing. A denial of a petition for an ex parte 1295 temporary injunction shall be by written order noting the legal 1296 grounds for denial. If the only ground for denial is no 1297 appearance of an immediate and present danger of stalking, the 1298 court shall set a final full hearing on the petition for 1299 injunction with notice at the earliest possible time. This 1300 paragraph does not affect a petitionerâs right to promptly amend 1301 any petition, or otherwise be heard in person on any petition 1302 consistent with the Florida Rules of Civil Procedure. 1303 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction is effective for 1304 a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. If a final full hearing is 1305 set, as provided in this section, the hearing shall be set for a 1306 date no later than the date when the temporary injunction ceases 1307 to be effective. The court may grant a continuance of the 1308 hearing before or during the a hearing for good cause shown by 1309 any party, which shall include a continuance to obtain service 1310 of process. An injunction shall be extended if necessary to 1311 remain in full force and effect during any period of 1312 continuance. 1313 (6)(a)âUpon notice and final hearing, when it appears to 1314 the court that the petitioner is the victim of stalking, the 1315 court may grant such relief as the court deems proper, including 1316 an injunction: 1317 1.âRestraining the respondent from committing any act of 1318 stalking. 1319 2.âOrdering the respondent to participate in treatment, 1320 intervention, or counseling services to be paid for by the 1321 respondent. 1322 3.âReferring a petitioner to appropriate services. The 1323 court may provide the petitioner with a list of certified 1324 domestic violence centers, certified rape crisis centers, and 1325 other appropriate referrals in the circuit which the petitioner 1326 may contact. 1327 4.âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 1328 for the protection of a victim of stalking, including 1329 injunctions or directives to law enforcement agencies, as 1330 provided in this section. 1331 (b)âThe terms of an injunction restraining the respondent 1332 under subparagraph (a)1. or ordering other relief for the 1333 protection of the victim under subparagraph (a)4. shall remain 1334 in effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 1335 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Specific 1336 allegations are not required. Such relief may be granted in 1337 addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 1338 (c)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 1339 protection against stalking entered pursuant to this section 1340 shall, on its face, indicate: 1341 1.âThat the injunction is valid and enforceable in all 1342 counties of this state. 1343 2.âThat law enforcement officers may use their arrest 1344 powers pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the 1345 injunction. 1346 3.âThat the court has jurisdiction over the parties and 1347 matter under the laws of this state and that reasonable notice 1348 and opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom 1349 the order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to 1350 due process. 1351 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 1352 temporary or final injunction order, if obtainable. 1353 (d)âThe fact that a separate injunction order of protection 1354 is granted to each opposing party is not legally sufficient to 1355 deny any remedy to either party or to prove that the parties are 1356 equally at fault or equally endangered. 1357 (e)âA final judgment on an injunction for protection 1358 against stalking entered pursuant to this section must, on its 1359 face, provide that it is a violation of s. 790.233 and a 1360 misdemeanor of the first degree for the respondent to have in 1361 his or her care, custody, possession, or control any firearm or 1362 ammunition. 1363 (f)âAll proceedings under this subsection shall be 1364 recorded. Recording may be by electronic means as provided by 1365 the Rules of General Practice and Judicial Administration. 1366 (7)âThe court shall allow an advocate from a state 1367 attorneyâs office, a law enforcement agency, a certified rape 1368 crisis center, or a certified domestic violence center who is 1369 registered under s. 39.905 to be present with the petitioner or 1370 respondent during any court proceedings or hearings related to 1371 the injunction for protection if the petitioner or respondent 1372 has made such a request and the advocate is able to be present. 1373 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court sets the case for 1374 a final hearing issues an injunction for protection against 1375 stalking, the clerk of the court shall electronically transmit a 1376 copy of the petition, designation of mailing and e-mail address, 1377 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to the 1378 sheriff or a law enforcement agency of the county where the 1379 respondent resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the 1380 respondent as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week 1381 and at any time of the day or night. The respondent shall inform 1382 the clerk of court of the respondentâs designated mail or e-mail 1383 address for subsequent service within 1 business day after the 1384 respondent has been personally served. An electronic copy of the 1385 temporary an injunction must be certified by the clerk of the 1386 court, and the electronic copy must be served in the same manner 1387 as a certified copy. Upon receiving an electronic copy of the 1388 temporary injunction, the sheriff must verify receipt with the 1389 sender before attempting to serve it on the respondent. In 1390 addition, if the sheriff is in possession of a temporary an 1391 injunction for protection that has been certified by the clerk 1392 of the court, the sheriff may electronically transmit a copy of 1393 that temporary injunction to a law enforcement officer who shall 1394 serve it in the same manner as a certified copy. The clerk of 1395 the court shall furnish to the sheriff such information 1396 concerning the respondentâs physical description and location as 1397 is required by the Department of Law Enforcement to comply with 1398 the verification procedures set forth in this section. 1399 Notwithstanding any other law, the chief judge of each circuit, 1400 in consultation with the appropriate sheriff, may authorize a 1401 law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction to effect 1402 service. A law enforcement agency serving injunctions pursuant 1403 to this section must use service and verification procedures 1404 consistent with those of the sheriff. 1405 2.âIf an injunction is issued and the petitioner requests 1406 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 1407 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 1408 accompany the petitioner to assist in the execution or service 1409 of the temporary or final injunction. A law enforcement officer 1410 must accept a copy of a temporary or final an injunction for 1411 protection against stalking, certified by the clerk of the 1412 court, from the petitioner and immediately serve it upon a 1413 respondent who has been located but not yet served. 1414 3.âAn order issued, changed, continued, extended, or 1415 vacated subsequent to the original service of documents 1416 enumerated under subparagraph 1. must be certified by the clerk 1417 of the court and delivered to the parties at the time of the 1418 entry of the order. The parties may acknowledge receipt of such 1419 order in writing on the face of the original order. If a party 1420 fails or refuses to acknowledge the receipt of a certified copy 1421 of an order, the clerk must shall note on the original order 1422 that service was effected. If delivery at the hearing is not 1423 possible, or the parties have appeared through audio-video 1424 communication technology, the clerk shall mail or e-mail 1425 certified copies of the order to the parties at the last known 1426 physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail or e 1427 mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order is 1428 served by the clerk of the court pursuant to this subsection, 1429 the clerk shall prepare a written certification to be placed in 1430 the court file specifying the time, date, and method of service 1431 and shall notify the sheriff. 1432 4.âIf the respondent has been served by a law enforcement 1433 officer previously with the a temporary injunction or a notice 1434 of hearing on a and has failed to appear at the initial hearing 1435 on the temporary injunction, any subsequent petition for 1436 injunction seeking an extension of time, any subsequent 1437 temporary or final injunction, or any subsequent order may be 1438 served on the respondent by the clerk of the court by certified 1439 mail or e-mail in lieu of personal service by a law enforcement 1440 officer. 1441 5.âA Statewide Injunction Verification System is created 1442 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall 1443 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication 1444 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1445 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1446 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 1447 injunctions, repeat violence injunctions, and stalking 1448 injunctions issued by the courts throughout this state. Such 1449 information must include, but is not limited to, information as 1450 to the existence and status of any injunction for verification 1451 purposes. 1452 (b)1.âSubsequent to the original service of documents in 1453 subparagraph (a)1., the clerk of the court, within 24 hours 1454 after the court issues a final an injunction for protection 1455 against stalking or changes, continues, extends, or vacates a 1456 temporary an injunction for protection against stalking, the 1457 clerk of the court must electronically transmit a certified copy 1458 of the injunction for service to the sheriff having jurisdiction 1459 over the residence of the petitioner. The clerk must mail or e 1460 mail certified copies of the order to the parties to the last 1461 known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by mail 1462 or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an order 1463 is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall prepare a 1464 written certification to be placed in the court file specifying 1465 the time, date, and method of service and shall electronically 1466 transmit a certified copy of the order to the sheriff with 1467 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner The injunction 1468 must be served in accordance with this subsection. 1469 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 1470 injunction for protection against stalking upon a respondent, 1471 the law enforcement officer must electronically transmit the 1472 written proof of service of process to the sheriff having 1473 jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 1474 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 1475 copy of the injunction for protection against stalking, the 1476 sheriff must make information relating to the injunction 1477 available to other law enforcement agencies by electronically 1478 transmitting such information to the Department of Law 1479 Enforcement. 1480 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 1481 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 1482 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 1483 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 1484 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 1485 Department of Law Enforcement. 1486 5.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues a final 1487 injunction for protection after a hearing or changes, continues, 1488 extends, or vacates an injunction for protection against 1489 stalking is vacated, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer 1490 effective by ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must 1491 mail or e-mail certified copies of the injunction order to the 1492 last known physical or e-mail address of each party. Service by 1493 mail or e-mail is complete upon mailing or e-mailing. When an 1494 order is served pursuant to this subsection, the clerk shall 1495 prepare a written certification to be placed in the court file 1496 specifying the time, date, and method or service. The clerk of 1497 the court must electronically transmit a certified copy of the 1498 injunction to the sheriff with jurisdiction over the residence 1499 of the petitioner. Within 24 hours after the sheriff receives a 1500 certified copy of the injunction for protection against stalking 1501 under this subsection, the sheriff must make information 1502 relating to the injunction available to other law enforcement 1503 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to 1504 notify the sheriff receiving original notification of the 1505 injunction as provided in subparagraph 2. That agency shall, 1506 within 24 hours after receiving such notification from the clerk 1507 of the court, notify the Department of Law Enforcement of such 1508 action of the court. 1509 (c)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 1510 after the court has issued a final injunction order of 1511 protection. 1512 (9)(a)âThe court may enforce a violation of a temporary or 1513 final an injunction for protection against stalking through a 1514 civil or criminal contempt proceeding, or the state attorney may 1515 prosecute it as a criminal violation under s. 784.0487. Any 1516 assessments or fines ordered by the court enforcing such an 1517 injunction shall be collected by the clerk of the court and 1518 transferred on a monthly basis to the State Treasury for deposit 1519 into the Domestic Violence Trust Fund. 1520 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 1521 officer under s. 901.15(6) or for a violation of s. 784.0487, 1522 the respondent shall be held in custody until brought before the 1523 court as expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing 1524 the injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with 1525 chapter 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, 1526 pending a hearing. 1527 (10)âThe petitioner or the respondent may move the court to 1528 modify or dissolve an injunction at any time. 1529 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1530 61.1825, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1531 61.1825âState Case Registry.â 1532 (3)(a)âFor the purpose of this section, a family violence 1533 indicator must be placed on a record when: 1534 1.âA party executes a sworn statement requesting that a 1535 family violence indicator be placed on that partyâs record which 1536 states that the party has reason to believe that release of 1537 information to the Federal Case Registry may result in physical 1538 or emotional harm to the party or the child; or 1539 2.âA temporary or final injunction for protection against 1540 domestic violence has been granted pursuant to s. 741.30(6), an 1541 injunction for protection against domestic violence has been 1542 issued by a court of a foreign state pursuant to s. 741.315, or 1543 a temporary or final injunction for protection against repeat 1544 violence has been granted pursuant to s. 784.046; or 1545 3.âThe department has received information on a Title IV-D 1546 case from the Statewide Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat 1547 Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System, established 1548 pursuant to s. 784.046(8)(b), that a court has granted a party a 1549 domestic violence or repeat violence injunction. 1550 Section 5.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 1551 943.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1552 943.05âCriminal Justice Information Program; duties; crime 1553 reports.â 1554 (2)âThe program shall: 1555 (e)âEstablish, implement, and maintain a Statewide Domestic 1556 and Repeat Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System 1557 capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1558 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1559 injunctions, injunctions to prevent child abuse issued under 1560 chapter 39, and repeat violence injunctions issued by the courts 1561 throughout the state. Such information must include, but is not 1562 limited to, information as to the existence and status of any 1563 such injunction for verification purposes. 1564 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1565 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1566 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 39.504, Florida 1567 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1568 39.504âInjunction; penalty.â 1569 (5)âService of process on the respondent shall be carried 1570 out pursuant to s. 741.30. The department shall deliver a copy 1571 of any injunction issued pursuant to this section to the 1572 protected party or to a parent, caregiver, or individual acting 1573 in the place of a parent who is not the respondent. Law 1574 enforcement officers may exercise their arrest powers as 1575 provided in s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 1576 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1577 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1578 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 1579 44.407, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1580 44.407âElder-focused dispute resolution process.â 1581 (3)âREFERRAL.â 1582 (b)âThe court may not refer a party who has a history of 1583 domestic violence or exploitation of an elderly person to 1584 eldercaring coordination unless the elder and other parties in 1585 the action consent to such referral. 1586 1.âThe court shall offer each party an opportunity to 1587 consult with an attorney or a domestic violence advocate before 1588 accepting consent to such referral. The court shall determine 1589 whether each party has given his or her consent freely and 1590 voluntarily. 1591 2.âThe court shall consider whether a party has committed 1592 an act of exploitation as defined in s. 415.102, exploitation of 1593 an elderly person or disabled adult as defined in s. 825.103(1), 1594 or domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 against another 1595 party or any member of another partyâs family; engaged in a 1596 pattern of behaviors that exert power and control over another 1597 party and that may compromise another partyâs ability to 1598 negotiate a fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads 1599 another party to have reasonable cause to believe that he or she 1600 is in imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. 1601 The court shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, 1602 including, but not limited to, the factors specified in s. 1603 741.30(6)(b). 1604 3.âIf a party has a history of domestic violence or 1605 exploitation of an elderly person, the court must order 1606 safeguards to protect the safety of the participants and the 1607 elder and the elderâs property, including, but not limited to, 1608 adherence to all provisions of an injunction for protection or 1609 conditions of bail, probation, or a sentence arising from 1610 criminal proceedings. 1611 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1612 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1613 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 1614 61.125, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1615 61.125âParenting coordination.â 1616 (4)âDOMESTIC VIOLENCE ISSUES.â 1617 (b)âIn determining whether there has been a history of 1618 domestic violence, the court shall consider whether a party has 1619 committed an act of domestic violence as defined s. 741.28, or 1620 child abuse as defined in s. 39.01, against the other party or 1621 any member of the other partyâs family; engaged in a pattern of 1622 behaviors that exert power and control over the other party and 1623 that may compromise the other partyâs ability to negotiate a 1624 fair result; or engaged in behavior that leads the other party 1625 to have reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent 1626 danger of becoming a victim of domestic violence. The court 1627 shall consider and evaluate all relevant factors, including, but 1628 not limited to, the factors listed in s. 741.30(6)(b). 1629 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1630 made by this act to section 741.30, Florida Statutes, in a 1631 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 741.29, Florida 1632 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1633 741.29âDomestic violence; investigation of incidents; 1634 notice to victims of legal rights and remedies; reporting.â 1635 (1)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an alleged 1636 incident of domestic violence shall: 1637 (a)âAssist the victim to obtain medical treatment if such 1638 is required as a result of the alleged incident to which the 1639 officer responds; 1640 (b)âAdvise the victim of such violence that there is a 1641 domestic violence center from which the victim may receive 1642 services; 1643 (c)âAdminister a lethality assessment consistent with the 1644 requirements established in subsection (2) if the allegation of 1645 domestic violence is against an intimate partner, regardless of 1646 whether an arrest is made; and 1647 (d)âGive the victim immediate notice of the legal rights 1648 and remedies available on a standard form developed and 1649 distributed by the department. As necessary, the department 1650 shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies Notice to Victims to 1651 include a general summary of s. 741.30 using simple English as 1652 well as Spanish, and shall distribute the notice as a model form 1653 to be used by all law enforcement agencies throughout this 1654 state. The notice must include: 1655 1.âThe resource listing, including telephone number, for 1656 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department 1657 of Children and Families; and 1658 2.âA copy of the following statement: 1659 1660 IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you may 1661 ask the state attorney to file a criminal complaint. 1662 You also have the right to go to court and file a 1663 petition requesting an injunction for protection from 1664 domestic violence which may include, but need not be 1665 limited to, provisions which restrain the abuser from 1666 further acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your 1667 household; prevent the abuser from entering your 1668 residence, school, business, or place of employment; 1669 award you custody of your minor child or children; and 1670 direct the abuser to pay support to you and the minor 1671 children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do 1672 so. 1673 1674 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.